District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.95

Scope of practice for elevator contractors, elevator mechanics, and elevator inspectors.

(a)

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Elevator contractor” means any sole proprietor, firm, or corporation who, for compensation, engages in erecting, constructing, installing, altering, servicing, repairing, or performing tests of elevators, platform lifts, stairway chair lifts, manlifts, conveyors, escalators, dumbwaiters, material lifts, automated people movers, and other related conveyances.

(2)

“Elevator mechanic” means any individual who engages in erecting, constructing, installing, altering, servicing, repairing, or testing elevators, platform lifts, stairway chair lifts, manlifts, conveyors, escalators, dumbwaiters, material lifts, automated people movers, and other related conveyances.

(3)

“Elevator inspector” means any individual who engages in performing inspections of elevators, platform lifts, stairway chair lifts, manlifts, conveyors, escalators, dumbwaiters, material lifts, automated people movers, and other related conveyances.

(b)

This part shall not apply to an electrician licensed under part F of this subchapter if the work performed by the electrician is work for which he or she is licensed to perform under part F of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(f), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).